Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-370
Contempt proceedings; attorney's fees; costs.

Nothing in sections 42-347 to 42-381 shall prohibit a party from initiating contempt proceedings. Costs, including a reasonable attorney's fee, may be taxed against a party found to be in contempt.

Laws 1972, LB 820, § 24;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 18.

In contempt actions in domestic relations cases, a trial court is authorized to award attorney fees only against a party found to be in contempt under this section or section 42-364.15; or, if a trial court determines the contempt action is frivolous, attorney fees may be awarded under section 25-824. Hawks v. Hawks, 32 Neb. App. 70, 993 N.W.2d 688 (2023).

In a civil contempt proceeding relating to an item in a divorce decree, costs, including a reasonable attorney fee, may be assessed against a contemnor. Locke v. Volkmer, 8 Neb. App. 797, 601 N.W.2d 807 (1999).